Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-362
Tax Commissioner; powers, duties, functions.

The Tax Commissioner, through the Department of Revenue, shall exercise those powers, duties, and functions vested in and administered by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1969, c. 630, § 2, p. 2532;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-341;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 3.